Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 18 Child Maltreatment Act
12-18-908. Removal of name from the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

If an adult offender is found guilty of, pleads guilty to, or pleads nolo contendere to an act that is the same act for which the offender is named in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry regardless of any subsequent expungement of the offense from the offender's criminal record, the offender shall always remain in the registry unless the conviction is reversed or vacated.

The Department of Human Services shall identify in its policy and procedures manual the types of child maltreatment that shall automatically result in the removal of the name of an offender from the registry.

If an offender has been entered into the registry as an offender for the named types of child maltreatment identified under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the offender's name shall be removed from the registry on reports of this type of child maltreatment if the offender has not had a subsequent true report of this type for one (1) year and more than one (1) year has passed since the offender's name was placed on the registry.

The department shall identify in its policy and procedures manual the types of child maltreatment for which an offender can request that the offender's name be removed from the registry.

If an offender has been entered into the registry as an offender for the named types of child maltreatment identified under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the offender may petition the department, requesting that the offender's name be removed from the registry if the offender has not had a subsequent true report of this type for one (1) year and more than one (1) year has passed since the offender's name was placed on the registry.

If the department denies the request for removal of the name from the registry, the offender shall wait one (1) year from the date of the request for removal before filing a new petition with the department, requesting that the offender's name be removed from the registry.

The department shall develop policy and procedures to assist it in determining whether to remove the offender's name from the registry.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, with regard to an offender who was a child at the time of the act or omission that resulted in a true finding of child maltreatment, the department shall:

Not remove the offender's name from the registry if the offender was found guilty of, pleaded guilty to, or pleaded nolo contendere to a felony in circuit court as an adult for the act that is the same act for which the offender is named in the registry unless the conviction is reversed or vacated; or

Remove the offender's name from the registry if:

The juvenile has reached eighteen (18) years of age or more than one (1) year has passed from the date of the act or omission that caused the true finding of child maltreatment and there have been no subsequent acts or omissions resulting in a true finding of child maltreatment; and

The offender can prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile offender has been rehabilitated.

If the department denies the request for removal of the name from the registry, the offender shall wait one (1) year from the date of the request for removal before filing a new petition with the department, requesting that the offender's name be removed from the registry.

If the department denies the request for removal of the name from the registry, the offender may request an administrative hearing within thirty (30) days from receipt of the department's decision.

The standard on review for the administrative hearing shall be whether the department abused its discretion.

At least ten (10) days prior to the administrative hearing, the alleged offender and the department shall share any information with the other party that the party intends to introduce into evidence at the administrative hearing that is not contained in the record.

If a party fails to timely share information, the administrative law judge shall:

Grant a continuance;

Allow the record to remain open for submission of rebuttal evidence; or

Reject the information as not relevant to the rehabilitation or the incident of child maltreatment.

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall adopt rules necessary to carry out this chapter pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., except that the secretary shall not begin the process under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., until the proposed rules have been reviewed by the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” and “secretary” for “director” in (f).

In denying appellant father's motion to change child custody, the trial court did not err in failing to apply the presumption in §9-13-101(c) that it was not in the best interest of a child to remain in the custody of an abusive parent because the record was completely devoid of any evidence of domestic violence. While appellee mother was placed on the child-maltreatment registry for a period of time pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this section for subjecting the child to a home that was filthy and infested with roaches, her poor housekeeping was not a form of domestic violence.Loftis v. Nazario, 2012 Ark. App. 98 (2012).

A report made under this chapter that is determined to be true, as well as any other information obtained, including protected health information and the administrative hearing decision, and a report written or photograph or radiological procedure taken concerning a true report in the possession of the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be confidential and shall be made available only to:

The administration of the adoption, foster care, children's and adult protective services programs, or child care licensing programs of any state;

A federal, state, or local government entity, or any agent of the entity, having a need for the information in order to carry out its responsibilities under law to protect children from abuse or neglect;

Any person who is the subject of a true report;

A civil or administrative proceeding connected with the administration of the Arkansas child welfare state plan when the court or hearing officer determines that the information is necessary for the determination of an issue before the court or agency;

An audit or similar activity conducted in connection with the administration of such a plan or program by any governmental agency that may by law conduct the audit or activity;

A person, agency, or organization engaged in a bona fide research or evaluation project having value as determined by the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police in future planning for programs for maltreated children or in developing policy directions.

However, any confidential information provided for a research or evaluation project under this subdivision (g)(6) shall not be redisclosed.

However, if a research or evaluation project results in the publication of related material, confidential information provided for a research or evaluation project under this subdivision (g)(6) shall not be disclosed;

A properly constituted authority, including multidisciplinary teams referenced in this chapter, investigating a report of known or suspected child abuse or neglect or providing services to a child or family that is the subject of a report;

The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education and the child care facility owner or operator who requested the registry information through a signed notarized release from an individual who is a volunteer, has applied for employment, is currently employed by a child care facility, or is the owner or operator of a child care facility.

This disclosure shall be for the limited purpose of providing registry background information and shall indicate a true finding only;

Child abuse citizen review panels described in the Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act, 42 U.S.C. § 5106a;

Child fatality review panels as authorized by the Department of Human Services;

A grand jury upon a finding that information in the record is necessary for the determination of an issue before the grand jury;

A court in a criminal case upon finding that the information in the record is necessary for the determination of an issue before the court.

The court may disclose the report to parties under the terms of a protective order issued by the court;

A court in a child custody or similar civil case upon finding that the information in the record is necessary for the determination of a health or safety issue concerning a child before the court.

The court may disclose the report to the parties under the terms or a protective order issued by the court;

The current foster parents of a child who is a subject of a report;

Federal, state, and local government entities, or any agent of such entities, that have a need for such information to carry out their responsibilities under law to protect children from child maltreatment.

Acting in their official capacities under law to protect children, disclosure may be made to individual United States and Arkansas senators and representatives and their authorized staff members, but only if they agree not to permit any redisclosure of the information except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment.

However, disclosure shall not be made to any committee or legislative body of any information that identifies any recipient of services by name or address;

A Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer upon presentation of an order of appointment for a child who is a subject of a report;

The attorney ad litem of a child who is the subject of a report;

An employer or volunteer agency for purposes of screening an employee, applicant, or volunteer who is or will be engaged in employment or activity with children, the elderly, individuals with disabilities, or individuals with mental illness upon submission of a signed, notarized release from the employee, applicant, or volunteer.

The registry shall release only the following information on true reports to the employer or agency:

That the employee, applicant, or volunteer has a true report;

The date the investigation was completed; and

The type of true report;

The Division of Developmental Disabilities Services and the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services as to participants of the waiver program;

The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education for purposes of enforcement of licensing laws and rules;

Any licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities;

Any person or entity to whom notification was provided under this chapter;

The extent necessary to carry out a responsibility to ensure that children are protected while in the school environment or during off-campus school activities:

A school district superintendent, a person in an equivalent position in a private school, or other district-level administrator;

A public school principal, a person in an equivalent position in a private school, or other building-level administrator;

Another person or organization designated by a public school, private school, or school district to organize volunteers for the public school, private school, or school district upon the submission of a signed, notarized release from the volunteer.

The registry shall release only the following information on true reports to a person or an organization:

That the employee, applicant, or volunteer has a true report;

The date the investigation was completed; and

The type of true report; and

Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;

The custodial and noncustodial parents, guardians, and legal custodians of the child who is identified as the offender;

Any family advocacy program or other person designated by the military authority for the military installation receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under § 12-18-508;

The custodial parent, custodian, or guardian of a child who is or may be currently cared for or supervised by the offender; and

A Child Welfare Ombudsman.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 945, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission to provide for independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas”.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (g)(11)(A) (now (g)(11)), substituted “A grand jury” for “A grand jury or court” and substituted “before the grand jury” for “before the court or grand jury”; rewrote (g)(11)(B) (now (g)(12)); and added (g)(11)(C) (now (g)(13)).

The 2013 amendment by No. 575 rewrote (g)(21) (now (g)(23)).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1006 rewrote (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(B); inserted “and the administrative hearing decision” following “health information” in the introductory language of (g); and substituted “the terms of” for “the terms or” in (g)(11)(B)(ii) (now (g)(12)(B)).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1004 inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1), (d)(3), (e)(1), the introductory language of (g), and in (g)(6)(A).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1097 inserted “a person in an equivalent position in a private school” in (g)(21)(A) and (g)(21)(B) (now (g)(23)(A) and (B)); inserted “private school” twice in (g)(21)(C)(i) (now (g)(23)(C)(i)); and added (g)(22) (now (g)(24)).

The 2017 amendment by No. 250, in (e)(1), inserted “child” preceding maltreatment” and substituted “offender” for “aggressor” at the end.

The 2017 amendment by No. 528 added (g)(25).

The 2017 amendment by No. 713 added (d)(5); redesignated former (g)(15)(A) as (g)(15)(A)(i); added (g)(15)(A)(ii); and made a stylistic change.

The 2017 amendment by No. 913 substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Aging and Adult Services” in (g)(19).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (g)(20).

The 2019 amendment by No. 531 added (g)(26).

The 2019 amendment by No. 590 redesignated (g)(15)(A)(i) and (g)(15)(B) as (g)(15)(B) and (g)(15)(C); added (g)(15)(A); deleted (g)(15)(A)(ii); and, in (g)(15)(B), inserted “under law to protect children, disclosure may be made to” and added “except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (d)(2), twice in (d)(3), in (d)(5), in (e)(1), and in (g)(6)(A); and substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (g)(23)(D).

The 2019 amendment by No. 945 added (g)(26) [now (g)(27)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 1081 inserted (d)(5)(A) and redesignated former (d)(5) as the introductory language of (d)(5) and (d)(5)(B); in the introductory language of (d)(5), deleted “This section does not prohibit the disclosure and discussion of” from the beginning, and added “may be” at the end; and added “Disclosed and discussed” in (d)(5)(B).

A reasonable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for researching, copying, or mailing records from a child maltreatment investigative file; and

A reasonable fee for reproducing copies of electronic media, such as audio tapes, video tapes, compact discs, DVDs, and photographs.

A fee shall not be charged to:

A nonprofit or volunteer agency that requests searches of the investigative files; or

A person who is indigent.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall not release data that would identify the person who made the report unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found it has reason to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report.

(1)Any person or agency to whom disclosure is made shall not disclose to any other person a report or other information obtained pursuant to this section.

Disclosed to and discussed with a member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee; and

Disclosed and discussed in closed meetings conducted by the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee under § 10-3-3201 et seq.

Any record of a screened-out or administratively closed report of child maltreatment shall not be disclosed except to the prosecuting attorney and law enforcement and may be used only within the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police for purposes of administration of the program.

An unsubstantiated report, including protected health information and the administrative hearing decision, shall be confidential and shall be disclosed only to:

The court may disclose the report to parties under the terms of a protective order issued by the court;

(A)A court in a child custody or similar civil case upon finding that the information in the record is necessary for the determination of a health or safety issue concerning a child before the court.

The court may disclose the report to the parties under the terms or a protective order issued by the court;

(A)Federal, state, and local government entities, or any agent of such entities, that have a need for such information to carry out their responsibilities under law to protect children from child maltreatment.

Acting in their official capacities under law to protect children, disclosure may be made to individual United States and Arkansas senators and representatives and their authorized staff members, but only if they agree not to permit any redisclosure of the information except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment.

However, disclosure shall not be made to any committee or legislative body of any information that identifies any recipient of services by name or address;

Law enforcement;

Any licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities;

Adult protective services;

The Division of Developmental Disabilities Services and the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services as to participants of the waiver program;

A Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer upon presentation of an order of appointment for a child who is a subject of a report;

The attorney ad litem of a child who is the subject of a report;

Any person or entity to whom notification was provided under this chapter;

The custodial and noncustodial parents, guardians, and legal custodians of the child who is identified as the offender;

Any family advocacy program or other person designated by the military authority for the military installation receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under §12-18-508; and

A Child Welfare Ombudsman.

Hard copy records of unsubstantiated reports shall be retained no longer than eighteen (18) months for purposes of audit.

Information on unsubstantiated reports included in the automated data system shall be retained indefinitely to assist the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police in assessing future risk and safety.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 802, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)All members of society desire the safety of all children;

“(2)A child raised under constant adult supervision may miss opportunities for growth that will negatively impact his or her mental and physical development;

“(3)The alarming rise of childhood obesity and diabetes is almost certainly linked to an increase in the sedentary lifestyle and lack of physical activity for children today, which is often encouraged by parents and guardians, including without limitation by insisting on driving their children to school;

“(4)As measured by incidences of mental health difficulties, the over-supervised youth of today experience more difficulties when they reach adulthood than earlier generations;

“(5)Earlier generations learned resilience by walking, bicycling, playing, helping, and solving problems without constant adult intervention;

“(6)Parents and guardians are often in the best position to weigh the risk and make decisions concerning the safety of children under their care, including without limitation where their child may go, with whom, and when; and

“(7)Parents and guardians who have done nothing more than briefly and safely permitted their children to remain unsupervised should not be subject to investigation and possible prosecution as it causes unnecessary governmental intrusion and diversion of valuable public resources.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act:

“(1)Protect and promote the inherent right of a parent or guardian to raise his or her children;

“(2)Protect the decision of a parent or a guardian to grant his or her children unsupervised time to engage in activities that include without limitation playing outside, walking to school, bicycling, remaining briefly in a vehicle, and remaining at home; and

“(3)Ensure that valuable public resources are used most effectively to protect children by providing a secondary review to ensure that:

“(A)Calls to the Child Abuse Hotline are properly accepted;

“(B)Child maltreatment investigations are closed when the results of the investigation indicate that the allegations lack merit; and

“(C)Only the names of offenders who pose a risk to a vulnerable population are placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.”

Acts 2019, No. 945, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission to provide for independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas”.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (f)(3)(A) (now (f)(3)), substituted “A grand jury” for “A grand jury or court” and “before a grand jury” for “before the court or grand jury”; rewrote (f)(3)(B) (now (f)(4)); and added (f)(3)(C) (now (f)(5)).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(B); added “and the administrative hearing decision” in the introductory language of (f); and substituted “the terms of” for “the terms or” in (f)(3)(B)(ii) (now (f)(4)(B)).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1004 inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1097 added (f)(12) (now (f)(14)).

The 2017 amendment by No. 528 added (f)(15).

The 2017 amendment by No. 713 added (d)(4); redesignated former (f)(6)(A) as (f)(6)(A)(i); added (f)(6)(A)(ii); and made a stylistic change.

The 2017 amendment by No. 913 substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Aging and Adult Services” in (f)(10).

The 2019 amendment by No. 590 redesignated (f)(6)(A)(i) and (f)(6)(B) as (f)(6)(B) and (f)(6)(C); added (f)(6)(A); deleted (f)(6)(A)(ii); and, in (f)(6)(B), inserted “under law to protect children, disclosure may be made to” and added “except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 802 inserted “administratively closed” in (a); and inserted “or administratively closed” in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 945 added (f)(16).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1081 inserted (d)(4)(A) and redesignated former (d)(4) as the introductory language of (d)(4) and (d)(4)(B); in the introductory language of (d)(4), deleted “This section does not prohibit the disclosure and discussion of” from the beginning, and added “may be” at the end; and added “Disclosed and discussed” in (d)(4)(B).

Because the circuit court erred by not conducting an in camera review of the alleged sexual assault victim's Department of Human Services file to determine if it contained information material to the defense concerning the victim's accusations against her biological father, which were later recanted, remand for further proceedings was necessary for the court to conduct an in camera review of the file. If the file contained information that probably would have changed the outcome of the trial, defendant was to receive a new trial unless the nondisclosure was harmless beyond a reasonable doubt.Taffner v. State, 2018 Ark. 99, 541 S.W.3d 430 (2018).

“Custodian of records” means the administrator of the Child Maltreatment Central Registry or his or her designee; and

“Records” means data, records, or documents that are created, collected, or compiled by or on behalf of the Department of Human Services, the Department of Arkansas State Police, or other entity authorized under this chapter to perform investigations or provide services to children, individuals, or families.

The records may be delivered by hand or registered mail.

(1)The records shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the custodian of records stating that:

The affiant is the duly authorized custodian of records and has authority to certify the records;

The attached copies are a true copy of all the records described in the subpoena duces tecum; and

The records were prepared by employees of the Department of Human Services or the Crimes Against Children Division of the Department of Arkansas State Police acting in the ordinary course of the business at or near the time of the child maltreatment investigation reported in the records.

If the registry does not have the records described in the subpoena duces tecum, or has only part of the records, the custodian of records shall state so in the affidavit and file the affidavit and records as the records are available.

The custodian of records may enclose a statement of costs pursuant to § 12-18-711 for copying the records, and the costs of copying the records shall be charged to the party requesting the subpoena duces tecum for the records.

If the subpoena duces tecum directs attendance in court, to the clerk or the judge of the court;

If the subpoena duces tecum directs attendance at a deposition, to the officer before whom the deposition is to be taken, at the place designated in the subpoena duces tecum for the taking of the deposition or at his or her place of business; and

In other cases, to the officer, body, or tribunal conducting the hearing, at a like address.

(1)(A)The copy of the records produced by the custodian of records shall remain sealed and be opened:

At the time of trial, deposition, or hearing; or

The child is subjected to neglect as defined under § 12-18-103(14)(B) and the department assesses the family and determines that the newborn and any other children, including siblings, under the custody or care of the mother are at substantial risk of serious harm such that the children need to be removed from the custody or care of the mother;

The child is dependent as defined in the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.; or

Circumstances or conditions of the child are such that continuing in his or her place of residence or in the care and custody of the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker presents an immediate danger to the health or physical well-being of the child.

If the department determines that a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the child remains after a reassessment under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section is performed, then the department shall file a petition for dependency-neglect.

This subsection does not apply if the parent, guardian, or custodian is not the alleged offender and the parent, guardian, or custodian is not alleged to have failed to protect the child.

If protective custody is taken by a juvenile division circuit court judge during juvenile proceedings concerning the child or a sibling of the child, the court shall:

The department shall:

Notify the circuit court if the department releases custody of a child whom the circuit court has taken into custody under this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “danger to the health or physical well-being of the child” for ”danger of severe maltreatment” in (a)(3).

The 2015 amendment substituted “to the end of” for “through” in (b); and added (c), (d), and (e).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (d) as (d)(1); added (d)(2) and (d)(3); and substituted “may implement a protection plan that allows the child to remain in his or her place of residence and includes services to address the safety of the child” for “shall file a petition for dependency-neglect” in (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment added (f).

Cross References. Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.

Order for the Arkansas Department of Human Services to provide a pregnant teenager with school uniforms and maternity clothes was clearly erroneous because the lack of such did not pose an immediate danger to the teenager's health or physical well-being under subsection (a) of this section; there was a lack of evidence to support the finding that the teenager was at immediate risk of severe maltreatment and that family services were necessary to prevent her removal, the failure to make findings necessitated reversal, and the trial court's personal recollections were not sufficient. In addition, even if the teenager lacked school uniforms and maternity clothes because her family could not afford them and was kept out of school as a result, this did not constitute neglect that warranted removal from the home.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. A.M., 2012 Ark. App. 240, 423 S.W.3d 86 (2012).

District court did not err in denying the child abuse investigator's motion to dismiss the parents'civil rights claim that she had removed their minor children from their home without an adequate basis because pleaded facts plausibly showed that she had acted under color of state law to separate the children from the parents, have them questioned and examined, and removed by police at her insistence.Stanley v. Finnegan, 899 F.3d 623 (8th Cir. 2018).

Cited: Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Veasley, 2016 Ark. App. 175 (2016).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2019, No. 910, §
5158.

12-18-909. Availability of true reports of child maltreatment from the central registry.

True reports of child maltreatment are confidential and may be disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may charge:

A reasonable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for researching, copying, or mailing records from a child maltreatment investigative file; and

A reasonable fee for reproducing copies of electronic media, such as audio tables, video tapes, compact discs, DVDs, and photographs.

A fee may not be charged to:

A nonprofit or volunteer agency that requests searches of the investigative files; or

A person who is indigent.

(1)The Department of Human Services shall not release data that would identify the person who made the report unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found it has reason to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report.

However, upon request, the information shall be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement.

(1)Any person or agency to whom disclosure is made shall not disclose to any other person a report or other information obtained pursuant to this section.

However, the person or agency is permitted to consult his or her or its own attorney regarding information provided by the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police.

However, a local educational agency or a school counselor shall forward all true reports of child maltreatment received from the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police when a child transfers from one (1) local educational agency to another and shall notify the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police of the child's new school and address, if known.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent subsequent disclosure by the subject of the report.

Confidential data, records, reports, or documents created, collected, or compiled by or on behalf of the Department of Human Services, the Division of Arkansas State Police, or other entity authorized under this chapter to perform investigations or provide services to children, individuals, or families may be:

Disclosed to and discussed with a member of the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee; and

Disclosed and discussed in closed meetings conducted by the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee under §10-3-3201 et seq.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may provide information, including protected health information, to a person or agency that provides services such as medical examination of, an assessment interview with, or diagnosis of, care for, treatment of, or supervision of a victim of child maltreatment, a juvenile offender, or an underaged juvenile offender.

This information may include:

The investigative determination or the investigation report; and

The services offered and provided.

If an alleged offender's name has been provisionally placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, any disclosure by the registry shall include the notation that the name has only been provisionally placed in the registry.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 23; 2013, No. 575, § 2; 2013, No. 1006, §§ 29-31; 2015, No. 1004, §§ 31-35; 2015, No. 1097, §§ 2, 3; 2017, No. 250, § 16; 2017, No. 528, § 6; 2017, No. 713, §§ 7, 8; 2017, No. 913, § 37; 2019, No. 315, § 877; 2019, No. 531, § 5; 2019, No. 590, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2223-2227; 2019, No. 945, § 8; 2019, No. 1081, § 8.

12-18-910. Availability of screened-out and unsubstantiated reports.

Screened-out, administratively closed, and unsubstantiated reports of child maltreatment are confidential and may be disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may charge:

However, upon request, the information shall be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement.

However, the person or agency is permitted to consult his or her or its own attorney regarding information provided by the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent subsequent disclosure by the subject of the report.

Confidential data, records, reports, or documents created, collected, or compiled by or on behalf of the Department of Human Services, the Division of Arkansas State Police, or other entity authorized under this chapter to perform investigations or provide services to children, individuals, or families may be:

The prosecuting attorney;

A subject of the report;

A grand jury upon a finding that information in the record is necessary for the determination of an issue before a grand jury;

(A)A court in a criminal case upon finding that the information in the record is necessary for the determination of an issue before the court.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 24; 2013, No. 1006, §§ 32–34; 2015, No. 1004, § 36; 2015, No. 1097, § 4; 2017, No. 528, § 7; 2017, No. 713, §§ 9, 10; 2017, No. 913, § 38;
2019, No. 590, § 4; 2019, No. 802, §§ 9, 10; 2019, No. 945, § 9;
2019, No. 1081, § 9.

12-18-911. Records — Subpoena duces tecum — Definitions.

As used in this section:

(1)A subpoena duces tecum for records shall be served on the custodian of records.

(A)When a subpoena duces tecum described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not request the personal attendance of the custodian of records and the Department of Human Services is not a party to the action, the subpoena duces tecum is complied with when the custodian of records delivers to the court clerk or the officer, court reporter, body, or tribunal issuing the subpoena duces tecum or conducting the hearing, a true and correct copy of all records described in the subpoena duces tecum and the affidavit described in subsection (c) of this section.

(1)The copy of the records produced by the custodian of records shall be separately enclosed in an inner envelope or wrapper and sealed with the title and number of the action, the name of the custodian of records, and the date of the subpoena duces tecum clearly written on the inner envelope or wrapper.

The sealed outer envelope or wrapper shall be addressed as follows:

Upon the direction of the judge, court, officer, body, or tribunal conducting the hearing.

Before directing that the inner envelope or wrapper be opened, the judge, court, officer, body, or tribunal first shall ascertain if the custodian of records is authorized to release the records under §12-18-620, §12-18-710, §12-18-909, or §12-18-910.

The records shall be opened in the presence of all parties who have appeared in person or by counsel at the trial, deposition, or hearing.

When the custodian of records is ordered to appear personally, he or she may open the sealed envelope or wrapper if the records produced are returned.

The copy of the records shall be admissible in evidence to the same extent as though the original record were offered and the custodian of records had been present and testified to the matters stated in the affidavit.

(1)(A)When the personal attendance of the custodian of records is requested, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause which reads: “The personal attendance of the custodian of records is necessary”.

When both the personal attendance of the custodian of records and the production of a copy of the records are requested, the subpoena duces tecum shall contain a clause which reads: “A copy of the records and the personal attendance of the custodian of records are necessary”.

When the personal attendance of the custodian of records is requested, the reasonable cost of producing the records and expenses for personal attendance shall be charged to the party requesting the subpoena duces tecum.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1097, § 5.

Subchapter 10

— Protective Custody